Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2404
Drugs; adulteration or misbranding; confiscation; destruction or sale; proceeds; disposition.

Any drug which is adulterated or misbranded within the meaning of sections 71-2401 and 71-2402, and which is sold, offered for sale or delivered within this state, shall be liable to be proceeded against where the same is found and seized for confiscation by a process of libel for condemnation. If such drug is condemned as being adulterated or misbranded or of a poisonous or deleterious character, within the meaning of said sections, the same shall be disposed of by destruction or sale as the court may direct, and the proceeds thereof, if sold, less the legal costs and charges, shall be paid into the treasury of this state, and such goods shall not be sold in any jurisdiction contrary to the provisions of said sections or the laws of that jurisdiction. Any libel proceeding in rem, under the provisions of this section, may be joined with any criminal prosecution in personam or may be prosecuted separately.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 12, p. 561;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-931;

R.S.1943, § 81-623.